penult.twol
Alphabet

A B C Ç D E F G Ğ H I İ J K L M N O Ö P R S Ş T U Ü V Y Z Q Ə X
a b c ç d e f g ğ h ı i j k l m n o ö p r s ş t u ü v y z q ə x
%{A%}
%{I%}
%{Q%}
%{K%}
%{N%}
%{C%}
%{SPC%}
%{D%}
%{synIn%}:%{I%}
%{synİn%}:%{I%}
%{synUn%}:%{I%}
%{synÜn%}:%{I%}
%{synIv%}:%{I%}
%{synUv%}:%{I%}
%{DASH%}
%-
;

Sets

sufVow = %{I%} %{A%} ;

Rules

"Del synIn"
%{synIn%}:0 <=> _ [ : ] [%-: ]* [sufVow: ] [ : ];

"Del synİn"
%{synİn%}:0 <=> _ [ : ] [%-: ]* [sufVow: ] [ : ];

"Del synUn"
%{synUn%}:0 <=> _ [ : ] [%-: ]* [sufVow: ] [ : ];

"Del synÜn"
%{synÜn%}:0 <=> _ [ : ] [%-: ]* [sufVow: ] [ : ];


"Del synIv"
%{synIv%}:0 <=> _ [ : ] [%-: ]* [%{I%}: ] [ : ];

"Del synUv"
%{synUv%}:0 <=> _ [ : ] [%-: ]* [%{I%}: ] [ : ];
